Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 2
ADOPTION

Law reviews.
For article, "The Adoptee Trap, the Accidental Beneficiary, and the Rational Testator", see 42

C
olo. Law. 29 (Feb. 2013); for comment, "Two Legal Mothers:

C
ementing Parental Rights for Lesbian Parents in Colorado", see 91 U. Colo. L. Rev. 1247 (2020).

19-5-200.2. Legislative declaration.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title to the contrary, it is the intent of the general assembly that the court shall protect and promote the best interests of the children who are the subjects of proceedings held pursuant to this part 2 while
giving due regard to the interests of any other individuals affected.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is beneficial for a child placed for adoption to be able to continue relationships with his or her brothers and sisters, regardless of age, in order that the siblings may share their strengths and association in their everyday and often common experiences;

When parents and other adult relatives are no longer available to a child, the child's siblings constitute his or her biological family;

When placing children in adoptive placements, efforts should be made to place siblings together, unless there is a danger of specific harm to a child or it is not in the child's or children's best interests to be placed together. The general assembly
further finds that if the county department locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, there should be a rebuttable presumption that placement of
the entire sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption should be rebuttable by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint
placement is not in the best interests of a child or of the children.

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 1198, § 1, effective May 19.

L. 2000:
Entire section amended, p. 476, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(2)(c) amended, p. 2627, § 9, effective June 5.

19-5-201. Who may be adopted.

Any child legally available for adoption as provided in section 19-5-203, under eighteen years of age, and either present in the state at the time the petition for adoption is filed or under the jurisdiction of a court in Colorado for at least six months
may be adopted. Upon approval of the court, a person eighteen years of age or older and under twenty-one years of age may be adopted as a child, and all provisions of this part 2 referring to the adoption of a child shall apply to
such a person.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 805, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2017:
Entire section amended, (HB 17-1304), ch. 339, p. 1807, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-4-105 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-5-202. Who may adopt.

Any person twenty-one years of age or older, including a foster parent, may petition the court to decree an adoption.

A minor, upon approval of the court, may petition the court to decree an adoption.

A person having a living spouse from whom he is not legally separated shall petition jointly with such spouse, unless such spouse is the natural parent of the child to be adopted or has previously adopted the child.

A person having a living partner in a civil union from whom the person is not legally separated shall petition jointly with the partner, unless the partner is the natural parent of the child to be adopted or has previously adopted the child.

A person who is a partner in a civil union may adopt a child of the other partner through the same process outlined in section 19-5-203 for a stepparent adoption and shall be considered a stepparent for the purpose of determining whether a child is available
for adoption pursuant to section 19-5-203 (1).

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 805, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 88:
(1) amended, p. 758, § 4, effective May 31.

L. 2013:
(4) and (5) added, (SB 13-011), ch. 49, p. 167, § 24, effective May 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-4-106 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-5-202.5. Adoption hearings - termination appeals - court docket priority - exceptions.

On and after July 1, 2002, any hearing concerning a petition for adoption filed in a district court, the Colorado court of appeals, or the Colorado supreme court and any hearing concerning a petition filed in the Colorado court of appeals or the Colorado
supreme court related to a child who is available for adoption due to an order of the court terminating the parent-child legal relationship shall be given a priority on the court's docket. On and after July 1, 2002, if there is
no determination on a case concerning a petition for adoption or a case concerning a child who is available for adoption due to an order of the court terminating the parent-child legal relationship by any such court within six
months of the filing of the petition, it shall be given a priority on the court's docket that supersedes the priority of any other priority civil hearing on the court's docket.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, nothing in this section shall affect the priority of a hearing concerning the issuance of a temporary protection order pursuant to section 13-14-104.5, C.R.S.

The provisions of this section shall be implemented within existing appropriations.

Source:

L. 2002:
Entire section added, p. 1643, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(2) amended, p. 1016, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2004:
(2) amended, p. 557, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2013:
(2) amended, (HB 13-1259), ch. 218, p. 1017, § 22, effective July 1.

19-5-203. Availability for adoption.

A child may be available for adoption only upon:

Order of the court terminating the parent-child legal relationship in a proceeding brought under article 3 or 5 of this title;

Order of the court decreeing the voluntary relinquishment of the parent-child legal relationship under section 19-5-103, 19-5-103.5, or 19-5-105;

Written and verified consent of the guardian of the person, appointed by the court, of a child whose parents are deceased;

Written and verified consent of the parent in a stepparent adoption where the other parent is deceased or his parent-child legal relationship has been terminated under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (1);

Written and verified consent of the parent in a stepparent adoption, accompanied by an affidavit or sworn testimony of such parent, that the other birth parent has abandoned the child for a period of one year or more or that the other birth parent has
failed without cause to provide reasonable support for such child for a period of one year or more. Upon filing of the petition in adoption, the court shall issue a notice directed to the other parent, which notice
shall state the nature of the relief sought, the names of the petitioner and the child, and the time and place set for hearing on the petition. If the address of the other parent is known, service of such notice
shall be in the manner provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure for service of process. Upon affidavit by the petitioner that, after diligent search, the address of the other parent remains unknown, the
court shall order service upon the other parent by one publication of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the hearing is to be held. The hearing shall not be held sooner than
thirty-five days after service of the notice is complete, and, at such time, the court may enter a final decree of adoption notwithstanding the time limitation in section 19-5-210 (2).

Written and verified consent in a second-parent adoption that the child has a sole legal parent, and the sole legal parent wishes the child to be adopted by a specified second adult.

In a petition for a second-parent adoption, the court shall require a written home study report prepared by a county department of human or social services, designated qualified individual, or child placement agency and approved by the department pursuant
to section 19-5-207.5 (2). If the child of a sole legal parent was adopted by that parent less than one hundred eighty-two days prior to the filing of an adoption petition by a second prospective parent and if the
second prospective parent was included in the home study report that was prepared pursuant to section 19-5-207 for the adoption of the child by the first parent, then that home study report is a valid home study
report for the purpose of the second parent's adoption. If the filing of a petition for adoption by the second prospective parent occurs one hundred eighty-two days or more after the adoption by the first parent,
a separate home study report is required pursuant to section 19-5-207.

Written and verified consent of the parent having only residual parental responsibilities when custody or parental responsibilities have been awarded or allocated to the other parent in a dissolution of marriage proceeding where the spouse of the parent
having custody or parental responsibilities wishes to adopt the child;

Written and verified consent of the parent or parents, as defined in section 19-1-103, in a stepparent adoption where the child's parents were not married at the time the child was conceived and born;

A statement by the department of human services or its designated agent as to whether any placement arranged outside the state of Colorado was carried out by a child placement agency licensed or authorized under the laws of another state to make placements;

Verification by the child placement agency, a county department of human or social services, or the attorney for the petitioner in any adoption proceeding that any custody obtained outside the state of Colorado was acquired by:

Proceedings to relinquish all parent-child legal relationships which complied with the laws of the state where conducted or conformed substantially to the laws of this state; or

Proceedings to terminate all parent-child legal relationships which complied with the laws of the state where conducted or conformed substantially to the laws of this state; or

Written and verified consent, under the conditions set forth in paragraphs (c) to (f) of this subsection (1), which was executed in accord with the laws of the state where granted or in substantial conformity with the laws of this state;

Verification by the department of human services or its designated agent that any custody obtained outside the state of Colorado was acquired by proceedings sanctioned by the federal immigration and naturalization service, or any successor agency, in
cooperation with the department of human services whenever such cooperation is authorized or advised by federal law;

Submission of an affidavit or sworn testimony of the adoptive relative in a kinship adoption that the birth parent or birth parents have abandoned the child for a period of one year or more or that the birth parent or birth parents have failed without
cause to provide reasonable support for such child for a period of one year or more, and that the relative seeking the kinship adoption has had physical custody of the child for a period of one year or more and the child
is not the subject of a pending dependency and neglect proceeding pursuant to article 3 of this title. Upon filing of the petition in adoption, the court shall issue a notice directed to the birth parent or birth parents,
which notice shall state the nature of the relief sought, the names of the petitioner and the child, and the time and place set for hearing on the petition. If the address of the birth parent is known, service of such notice
shall be in the manner provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure for service of process. Upon affidavit by the petitioner that describes with specificity the diligent search made by the petitioner, and that states
that, after diligent search, the address of the birth parent or birth parents remains unknown, the court shall order service upon the birth parent or birth parents by one publication of the notice in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the hearing is to be held. The hearing shall not be held sooner than thirty-five days after service of the notice is complete, and, at such hearing, the court may enter a final decree
of adoption notwithstanding the time limitation in section 19-5-210 (2).

Submission of an affidavit or sworn testimony of the legal custodian or legal guardian in a custodial adoption that the birth parent or birth parents have abandoned the child for a period of one year or more or that the birth parent or birth parents have
failed without cause to provide reasonable support for such child for a period of one year or more and that the legal custodian or legal guardian seeking the custodial adoption has had the child in his or her physical custody
for a period of one year or more. Upon filing of the petition in adoption, the court shall issue a notice directed to the birth parent or birth parents, which notice shall state the nature of the relief sought, the names
of the petitioner and the child, and the time and place set for hearing on the petition. If the address of the birth parent or birth parents is known, service of such notice shall be in the manner provided by the Colorado
rules of civil procedure for service of process. Upon affidavit by the petitioner that describes with specificity the diligent search made by the petitioner, and that states that, after diligent search, the address of the
birth parent or birth parents remains unknown, the court shall order service upon the birth parent or birth parents by one publication of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the hearing
is to be held. The hearing shall not be held sooner than thirty-five days after service of the notice is complete, and, at such hearing, the court may enter a final decree of adoption notwithstanding the time limitation
in section 19-5-210 (2).

Written consent to any proposed adoption shall be obtained from the person to be adopted if such person is twelve years of age or older.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 805, § 1, effective October 1; (1)(f) amended, p. 1587, § 61, effective October 1.

L. 94:
(1)(g) and (1)(i) amended, p. 2688, § 211, effective July 1.

L. 97:
(1)(d)(II) amended, p. 1161, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(1)(f) amended, p. 822, § 29, effective August 5; (1)(e) amended, p. 1410, § 73, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:
(1)(j) and (1)(k) added, p. 1062, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2005:
(1)(b) amended, p. 765, § 25, effective June 1.

L. 2007:
(1)(d.5) added, p. 837, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2011:
(1)(i) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1158, § 38, effective August 10.

L. 2012:
(1)(d)(II), (1)(d.5)(II), (1)(j), and (1)(k) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 878, § 140, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
(1)(d.5)(II) and IP(1)(h) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 426, § 69, effective August 8; (1)(f) amended, (SB 18-095), ch. 96, p. 754, § 11, effective August 8.

L. 2021:
(1)(f) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 735, § 87, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-4-107 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-095, see section 1 of chapter 96, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-5-203.5. Confirmatory adoption - short title - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Court" means a district or juvenile court that has jurisdiction over the adoption.

"Petitioner" means the person or persons filing a petition for adoption in accordance with this section.

Whenever a child is conceived as a result of assisted reproduction and the person who did not give birth is a parent or a presumed parent pursuant to section 19-4-106, or a child has a presumed parent pursuant to section 19-4-105, or when married parents
engaging in surrogacy in another state that results in a court order establishing only one spouse as the parent, the parents may complete an adoption of the child to affirm parentage in accordance with this section. Both
parents must join the petition as petitioners.

A complete petition for adoption must include the following documents:

A copy of the petitioners' marriage or civil union certificate if the parents were married or in a civil union at the time of birth, if applicable, and declarations by the parent who did not give birth explaining the circumstances of birth and that the
person is a parent based on contributing gametes or consenting to the conception of a child through assisted reproduction pursuant to section 19-4-106 and attesting that the child was born as a result of assisted
reproduction and attesting that no competing claims of parentage exist;

A copy of the child's birth certificate;

If the child has attained the age of twelve years of age, the consent of the child; and

A sworn statement by each petitioner acknowledging parentage.

A complete petition for adoption, as described in subsection (2)(b) of this section, serves as the petitioners' written consent to adoption.

If the child is conceived using sperm, an egg, or an embryo from a donor, the court shall not require notice of the adoption to the donor or consent to the adoption by the donor.

The petitioners may file in, and jurisdiction is appropriate in, any of the following:

The county where the child at issue is conceived or born;

The county of residence of one or both of the petitioners; or

A Colorado county chosen by the petitioners so long as the child was conceived or born in Colorado. The petitioners are not required to be residents of Colorado for jurisdiction to be appropriate so long as the child was conceived or born in Colorado.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause shown, for purposes of evaluating and granting a petition for adoption pursuant to this section, the court shall not require:

An in-person hearing or appearance;

A home study by, notice to, or approval of the state department of human services or a licensed child placement agency as defined in section 19-1-103;

Fingerprinting or a criminal offender record information search;

Verification that the child is not registered with the federal register for missing children or the central register; or

A minimum residency period in the home of the petitioner.

The court shall grant the adoption and issue a decree of adoption within thirty days after finding:

(I) The petitioner filed a complete petition for adoption pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section; and

(II) (A) For parents who are spouses or civil union partners, the petitioners were married or in a civil union at the time of the child's conception or birth; or

(B) For presumed parents, or any other person with a claim to parentage of the child who is required to provide notice of, or consent to, the adoption, the person has received notice and provided consent to the adoption.

A petition to adopt, pursuant to this section, when a petitioner's parentage is presumed or legally recognized under Colorado law, must not be denied solely on the basis that the petitioner's parentage is already presumed or legally recognized.

When parentage is presumed or legally recognized pursuant to Colorado law, failure to petition for adoption pursuant to this section may not be considered as evidence when two or more presumptions conflict pursuant to section 19-4-105 (2)(a), nor in determining
the best interest of the child.

After the decree of adoption is issued regarding a child born to one or more parents, regardless of marital status, each parent is considered an equal parent with equal parenting rights and responsibilities.

The decree of adoption must include findings that the parent who gave birth, or the adjudicated parent, and the parent who adopted the child are the parents of the child.

The short title of this section is "Marlo's Law".

Source:

L. 2022:
Entire section added, (HB 22-1153), ch. 210, p. 1386, § 1, effective August 10.

19-5-204. Venue.

A petition for adoption shall be filed in the county of residence of the petitioner or in the county in which the placement agency is located.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 806, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-105 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-5-205. Adoption decree of foreign country approved.

A petition seeking a decree declaring valid an adoption granted by a court of any country other than the United States of America may be filed at any time by residents of the state of Colorado.

The petition shall contain all information required in section 19-5-207 (2); except that the court shall not require the petition to contain or be accompanied by the written consent described in section 19-5-207 (1), the written home study report described
in section 19-5-207 (2)(a), the fees described in section 19-5-207.5 (4), or a written legal memorandum with specific references to the applicable law of the foreign country.

The court shall issue a decree declaring valid an adoption granted by a court of competent jurisdiction or other authorized individual or entity of a country other than the United States of America upon a finding that:

At the time the petition is filed, the petition contains a verified statement that at least one of the adopting parents is a citizen and resident of the state of Colorado or other evidence that at least one of the adopting parents is a citizen and resident
of the state of Colorado;

The original or a certified copy of a valid foreign adoption decree, together with a notarized translation, is presented to the court; and

The child is either a permanent resident or a naturalized citizen of the United States. A photocopy of the child's resident alien card issued by the immigration and naturalization service of the United States, department of justice, or any successor agency,
shall be sufficient evidence that the child is either a permanent resident or a naturalized citizen of the United States.

(2.5) The adopting parties filing a petition pursuant to this section shall not be required to be represented by an attorney.

Any decree issued pursuant to this section shall have the same legal effect as any decree of adoption issued by the court.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 806, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 97:
(1)(b) and (2) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1162, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(1)(b) amended, p. 1024, § 5, effective May 29.

L. 2011:
(2)(c) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1158, § 39, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-4-107.5 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-5-205.5. Nonpublic agency interstate and foreign adoptions - authority for state department to select agencies - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that timely processing of adoptions is in the best interests of the children being adopted. It is therefore the intent of the general assembly to expedite permanency for those children who are being adopted. It is the purpose
of this section to promote timely processing of nonpublic agency interstate and foreign adoptions while increasing the department of human services' capacity to utilize existing staff to perform other child welfare functions.

The department is authorized to select nonpublic, licensed child placement agencies authorized to handle adoptions or nonpublic agencies that meet the qualifying criteria to be licensed child placement agencies pursuant to part 9 of article 6 of title
26, and any implementing rules promulgated by the department for the provision of services to individuals seeking assistance in nonpublic agency interstate or foreign adoption cases pursuant to this part 2. The department
shall, by rule, establish qualifying criteria by which such nonpublic agencies are selected for this purpose.

The department shall further promulgate rules creating standards by which the department may evaluate the delivery of services by the selected nonpublic agencies and identifying the services and functions to be rendered by the nonpublic agencies selected
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) including, but not limited to, the following:

The review of all background information concerning the birth parents and individual case material on the adopting family's assessment;

The review of all legal documents related to the relinquishment or termination of the birth parents' rights;

The review of all birth and medical information;

The review of correspondence with the immigration and naturalization service in the United States, department of justice, or any successor agency, in foreign adoptions;

The review of the child's social history, legal documents, medical information, and birth certificate in foreign adoption cases in which the child is to be placed in Colorado;

The provision of relinquishment counseling;

The promotion of permanent plans for the adopted child;

The agency's compliance with federal and Colorado laws, including, but not limited to, the "Interstate Compact on Placement of Children" as set forth in part 18 of article 60 of title 24, C.R.S.;

The timeliness of the provision of services; and

The overall protection of the child being adopted.

Nonpublic agencies may charge reasonable and necessary fees and costs to defray the direct and indirect expenses associated with the provision of nonpublic agency interstate and foreign adoption services associated with the statutorily required review
and approval of interstate and foreign adoptive placements. Pursuant to section 19-5-208 (4), all fees and costs charged for services associated with the review and approval of interstate and foreign adoptions shall be
separately specified in the expenses listed for the court's review as required.

The department of human services shall, by rule, establish guidelines for the fees and costs which such nonpublic agencies selected pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may charge for the delivery of such services.

All interstate and foreign adoptions in Colorado made by the court, the county departments of human or social services, or licensed child placement agencies must be made pursuant to section 19-5-206 (1).

For purposes of this section, "nonpublic agency interstate and foreign adoption" is defined in section 19-1-103.

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 1200, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:
(4) amended, p. 84, § 10, effective March 20.

L. 97:
(2)(a), IP(2)(b), and (2)(b)(I) amended and (5) added, p. 1162, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2011:
(2)(b)(IV) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1159, § 40, effective August 10.

L. 2018:
(4) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 427, § 70, effective August 8.

L. 2021:
(5) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 735, § 88, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(2)(a) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 837, § 43, effective July 1.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-5-206. Placement for purposes of adoption.

A placement of any child legally available for adoption pursuant to section 19-5-203 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), or (1)(g) must not be made for the purposes of adoption except by the court pursuant to section 19-5-104 (2), the county department of human or
social services, or a licensed child placement agency.

In child welfare cases, a child's best interests shall be the primary consideration for a court, county department, or licensed child placement agency in making determinations concerning the placement of the child for the purpose of adoption.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1106), ch. 278, p. 1272, § 2, effective May 26, 2010.)

An agency that has responsibility for placing children out of the home shall use good faith efforts and due diligence to recruit and retain prospective foster and adoptive families from communities that reflect the racial, ethnic, cultural, and linguistic
backgrounds of the children in the agency's care.

In making determinations concerning the placement of a child for the purpose of adoption, a court, county department, or licensed child placement agency may, under extraordinary circumstances, consider the racial or ethnic background, color, or national
origin of:

The child; or

A family who has submitted an application to adopt.

A court, county department, or licensed child placement agency shall not delay a foster or adoptive placement of a child as a result of the racial or ethnic background, color, or national origin of:

The child; or

A family who has submitted an application to foster or adopt a child.

In private adoption cases, a birth parent or birth parents may designate a specific applicant with whom they may wish to place their child for purposes of adoption. After assessment and approval of the potential adoptive parents and subsequent relinquishment
of the child, the court shall grant guardianship of the child to a person or agency described in section 19-5-104 (1) until finalization of adoptive placement.

The court may waive the assessment and approval of the potential adoptive parents in cases involving kinship or custodial adoption or may determine and order the kind of information or written report it deems necessary for the assessment and approval
of the potential adoptive parents, including an abbreviated home study or home evaluation. The court may proceed to finalize such adoptive placement upon finding that the placement is in the best interests of the child.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1106), ch. 278, p. 1272, § 2, effective May 26, 2010.)

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 807, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(2) amended, p. 938, § 2, effective March 21.

L. 94:
(2) amended, p. 71, § 1, effective March 15; (3) added, p. 673, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(2) amended, p. 1063, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2010:
(2) and (3) amended, (HB 10-1106), ch. 278, p. 1272, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2018:
(1) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 427, § 71, effective August 8.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-4-108 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.